Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-3808
List of registered kratom products; department; duty.

Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Tax Commissioner pursuant to subsection (1) of section 71-3807, the department shall make public a list of all registered kratom products on its website.

Laws 2025, LB230, § 8.